test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tarye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - тарˮ: # Noun 'hair' - partial paradigm /Type 34/
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom: тарˮ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc: тармʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen: тарʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Dat: тартʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [таркана, таркна]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Abl: таркад
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Pros: [тармна, тарˮмна]
     тарˮ+N+Du+Nom: таркʼ
     тарˮ+N+Du+Acc: таркʼ
     тарˮ+N+Du+Gen: таркʼ
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Nom: тарˮ
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Acc: таре
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Gen: тареˮ
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Dat: таркˮ
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [таркаˮна, таркˮна]
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Abl: таркат
     тарˮ+N+Pl+Pros: тареˮмана
     
     тарˮ+N+Tra: [тарˮӈэ, тарӈэ]
     тарˮ+N+Car: тарциˮ
     тарˮ+N+Equ: тартремʼ
     тарˮ+N+Equ+Lat: тартревʼ

# Possessive forms 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [тарм, тарˮм]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тал  
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тарта 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [тармиʼ, тарˮми]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: талиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: [тармаˮ, тарˮмаˮ]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: талаˮ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тартоʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [тарм, тарˮм] 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тарт  
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тарта 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: [тармиʼ, тарˮми]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: [тармаˮ, тарˮмаˮ]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тартаˮ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тартоʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [тарн, тарˮн] 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тарт 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тарта 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [тарниʼ, тарˮниʼ] 
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: таретиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: таретиʼ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [тарнаˮ, тарˮнаˮ]
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тартаˮ
     тарˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тартоʼ  
